Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-248
School lands; timber; sale; public auction.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds may sell timber on educational lands whenever the board deems it for the best interest of school funds. Said timber shall be sold at public auction in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 22, p. 312;

R.S.1913, § 5869;

C.S.1922, § 5205;

C.S.1929, § 72-225;

R.S.1943, § 72-248;

Laws 1949, c. 214, § 1, p. 611.